Maine, session 132, LD829.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §756, sub-§2, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 607, §1, is amended
to read:
G. When the firearm is a concealed firearm handgun, as defined in Title 25, section
2002, subsection 8-A, carried by a person to whom a valid permit to carry a concealed
firearm has been issued as provided in Title 25, chapter 252 who is not otherwise
prohibited from possessing a firearm. The person must have in that person's possession
the permit as required in Title 25, section 2003.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §1803, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2013, c. 405, Pt. A, §24 and
c. 424, Pt. A, §4, is further amended to read:
7. Exceptions Exception. Notwithstanding subsection 6 or any other rule-making
authority, the bureau may not adopt rules that prohibit the following persons a person who
is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm from carrying a concealed handgun
in the buildings or parts of buildings and other public property that are under the bureau’s
jurisdiction:.
A. A person to whom a valid permit to carry a concealed handgun has been issued
under Title 25, chapter 252. The person must have in that person's possession the valid
permit;
B. A person to whom a valid permit to carry a concealed handgun has been issued by
another state if a permit to carry a concealed handgun issued from that state has been
granted reciprocity under Title 25, chapter 252. The person must have in that person's
possession the valid permit;
C. An authorized federal, state or local law enforcement officer in the performance of
that officer's official duties;
D. A qualified law enforcement officer pursuant to 18 United States Code, Section
926B. The law enforcement officer must have in that law enforcement officer's
possession photographic identification issued by the law enforcement agency by which
the person is employed as a law enforcement officer; and
Page 1 - 132LR1138(01)

E. A qualified retired law enforcement officer pursuant to 18 United States Code,
Section 926C. The retired law enforcement officer must have in the retired law
enforcement officer's possession:
(1) Photographic identification issued by the law enforcement agency from which
the person retired from service as a law enforcement officer that indicates that the
person has, not less recently than one year before the date the person carries the
concealed handgun, been tested or otherwise found by the agency to meet the
standards established by the agency for training and qualification for active law
enforcement officers to carry a handgun of the same type as the concealed
handgun; or
(2) Photographic identification issued by the law enforcement agency from which
the person retired from service as a law enforcement officer and a certification
issued by the state in which the person resides that indicates that the person has,
not less recently than one year before the date the person carries the concealed
handgun, been tested or otherwise found by that state to meet the standards
established by that state for training and qualification for active law enforcement
officers to carry a handgun of the same type as the concealed handgun.
Sec. 3. Department to update rules. The Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Parks and Lands shall update its rules to remove the requirement
that a person have a valid permit in order to carry a concealed handgun in state parks,
Baxter State Park and the Allagash Wilderness Waterway.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.